Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202643-1501
Act, how cited.

Sections 43-1501 to 43-1524 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act.

Laws 1985, LB 255, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB566, § 4;

Laws 2026, LB1032, § 17.
July 18, 2026
The lower standard of proof under subsection (3) of section 43-279.01 for the termination of parental rights to non-Indian children, as opposed to the higher standard of proof under the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act does not violate the equal protection rights of parents of non-Indian children. In re Interest of Phoenix L. et al., 270 Neb. 870, 708 N.W.2d 786 (2006).

A party to a proceeding who seeks to invoke a provision of the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act has the burden to show that the act applies in the proceedings. In re Interest of A.M., C.M., and L.M., 235 Neb. 506, 455 N.W.2d 572 (1990).